Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 10. PROPERTY AND CASUALTY INSURANCE

SUBTITLE A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 1812. AVAILABILITY OF SPECIMEN POLICIES

Sec. 1812.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "specimen policy" means a standardized form, including an insurance policy form or endorsement, used by an insurer to write personal automobile, commercial automobile, inland marine, or residential property insurance in this state that does not contain personally identifiable information about an insured.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 101 (S.B. 852), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 1812.002. AVAILABILITY OF CERTAIN FORMS. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code relating to the delivery of policy forms, an insurer may elect to make a personal automobile, commercial automobile, inland marine, or residential property insurance policy available to an insured by posting a specimen policy on the insurer's Internet website instead of other authorized means. An insurer making the election must comply with Section 1812.003.

(b) On request of and at no cost to an insured, an insurer shall provide to the insured a copy of a specimen policy applicable to the insured that is posted on the insurer's Internet website.

(c) The office of public insurance counsel may post an insurer's specimen policy on the office's Internet website. The posting, other than a posting described by Subsection (a), of an insurer's specimen policy on an Internet website does not create a duty to comply with the requirements of this chapter.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 101 (S.B. 852), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 842 (S.B. 494), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 1812.003. NOTICE OF AVAILABILITY OF CERTAIN FORMS. (a) An insurer that posts a specimen policy on the insurer's Internet website under this chapter must, on issuance or renewal of a policy incorporating the specimen policy:

(1) on the declarations page of the insured's policy:

(A) disclose that the specimen policy is available on the insurer's Internet website; and

(B) clearly identify each posted specimen policy incorporated into the insured's policy;

(2) explain that and how an insured, on request and at no charge, may obtain a copy of the specimen policy from the insurer; and

(3) provide to the department and the office of public insurance counsel an electronic copy of the specimen policy that may be posted on the Internet website of the department or the office of public insurance counsel.

(b) An insurer that during an insured's policy period posts a specimen policy or amends a posted specimen policy incorporated into an insured's policy must, on the date the specimen policy is posted or amended, in writing and in the insurer's customary manner of communicating with the insured:

(1) notify the insured that the specimen policy is available on the insurer's Internet website;

(2) clearly identify each added or amended specimen policy incorporated into the insured's policy; and

(3) explain that and how the insured, on request and at no charge, may obtain a copy of the specimen policy from the insurer.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 101 (S.B. 852), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 1812.004. ACCESSIBILITY OF CERTAIN AVAILABLE FORMS. A specimen policy posted on the insurer's Internet website under this chapter must be, until no policy incorporating the specimen policy is in force:

(1) easily accessible on the website; and

(2) provided in a format readily capable of being saved or printed using a widely available and free computer application or program.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 101 (S.B. 852), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 1812.005. RETENTION OF CERTAIN AVAILABLE FORMS. An insurer that posts a specimen policy on the insurer's Internet website under this chapter must for at least five years after the latest date a policy incorporating the specimen policy is in force:

(1) preserve an electronic copy of the specimen policy; and

(2) make a printed or electronic copy of the specimen policy available on request at no cost.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 101 (S.B. 852), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.